Missouri, session 2026, HB3343.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.514, to read as follows:
9.514. July fifteenth each year is hereby designated as "Leon Jordan Day" in
2 Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate events
3 and activities to celebrate the life and legacy of Leon Jordan, an influential African-
4 American politician and civil rights leader who was assassinated on July 15, 1970, while
5 serving as a member of the Missouri house of representatives.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.